California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 422.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.507.

Except as provided in Section 10195 with respect to regulation of group Medicare supplemental insurance, and provisions of law regulating group long-term care insurance, no certificate of group disability insurance advertised or marketed to persons in this state shall be issued or delivered on or after January 1, 1989, to any person 55 years of age or older in this state pursuant to a group master insurance policy issued or delivered in another state unless the certificate and master policy have been filed with, and approved by, the commissioner.

This section does not apply to policies issued to one or more employers or labor organizations, or to the trustees of funds established by one or more employers or labor organizations, or combination thereof, for employees or former employees, or combination thereof, or for members or former members, or combination thereof, of the labor organization.

The commissioner shall adopt regulations necessary to interpret and implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1322, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.51.

The state and any political subdivisions thereof and any municipality, may provide for the type of insurance set forth in Section 10270.5 of this code the same as any private employer and may contribute to a fund established under such section the same as any private employer.

A county may include as persons eligible under its master policy issued pursuant to Section 10270.5, employees of a district located wholly or partially within the county. Such inclusion of district employees is subject to Section 53200.4 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 935.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.55.

(a) With respect to a policy issued to a corporation, copartnership or individual employer eligible for group insurance pursuant to Section 10270.5, the term “employees” may be deemed to include the officers, managers and employees of subsidiary or affiliated corporations, and the individual proprietors, partners and employees of affiliated individuals and firms, when the business of such subsidiary or affiliated corporations, firms or individuals is controlled by the policyholder through stock ownership, contract or otherwise, or when the policyholder is controlled by affiliated corporations, firms or individuals through stock ownership, contract or otherwise.

(b) With respect to a policy issued to a copartnership or individual employer pursuant to Section 10270.5, the term “employees” may be deemed to include the individual proprietor or partners of the policyholder.

(c) With respect to a policy issued to a trust pursuant to subdivisions (1) or (4) of subsection (a) of Section 10270.5 the term “employees” may be deemed to include (1) the individual proprietors and partners of any employers which are individual proprietors or partnerships, (2) the employees of an association and (3) the trustee, or trustees, or the employees of the trustee, or trustees, or both, if their duties are principally connected with such trusteeship.

(d) With respect to a policy issued to an association pursuant to subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of Section 10270.5 the term “members” may be deemed to include the employees of the association.

(e) Nothing contained herein shall permit a director of a corporate employer to become insured under a group policy unless such person is otherwise eligible as a bona fide employee of the corporation by performing services other than the usual duties of a director.

(f) Nothing contained herein shall permit an individual proprietor or partner to become insured under a group policy unless he is actively engaged in and devotes a substantial part of his time to the conduct of the business of the proprietor or partnership.

(g) Nothing contained herein shall permit any employee to become insured under a group policy unless he is an officer, manager, or employee for compensation of the employer to whom a group policy is issued, or of one or more of the individuals, firms, or corporations specified in subdivision (a), or of the association or trustee or trustees specified in subdivision (c), or of the association specified in subdivision (d).

(h) Officers, managers, and employees of a public agency who receive no compensation may be insured under a group policy purchased pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 53200) of Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.57.

Another form of group disability insurance is that form of disability insurance conforming to the following conditions:

(a) Written under a master policy issued to the trustee of any self-employed individuals, whether or not they have any employees, all of whom have contracts with the same publisher of a newspaper, for the performance of services for such publisher as independent contractors, offering insurance to such self-employed individuals and to all the employees of any such persons and covering not less than 10 such self-employed individuals and their employees or such individuals and their employees together with their dependents or spouses for amounts of insurance based upon some plan which will preclude individual selection by the eligible person as to the amount of his insurance coverage thereunder;

(b) For delivery to each person insured thereunder, other than dependents or spouses of an insured employee or person, there is issued to the holder of the master policy by the insurer an individual certificate setting forth the benefits and the exceptions under, and referring to, the master policy under which the certificate is issued.

Such certificates are not subject to the provisions of this chapter relating to the master policy, but the forms thereof shall be submitted to the commissioner for his approval and shall not be issued without such approval of such forms in the manner provided in the case of the master policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1528.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.6.

Every group disability master policy shall contain the following provisions:

(a) A provision that the policy, the application of the policyholder, and the individual applications, if any, of the individuals insured shall constitute the entire contract between the parties, and that all statements made by the policyholder, or by the individuals insured shall, in the absence of fraud, be deemed representations and not warranties, and that no such statement shall be used in defense to a claim under the policy, unless it is contained in a written application;

(b) A provision that the insurer will issue to the
 policyholder for delivery to the individuals insured under such policy, an individual certificate setting forth a statement as to the insurance protection to which he or she is entitled and to whom payable;

(c) A provision that to the group or class thereof originally insured shall be added from time to time all new employees, members, or pupils of the policyholder eligible to and applying for insurance in such group or class;

(d) A statement that such policy is not in lieu of and does not affect any requirement for coverage by workers’ compensation
 insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 231, Sec. 16.   (AB 2045)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.63.

An individual certificate shall be individualized, except that in the case of an individual certificate under a group policy which requires no regular contribution toward the payment of the premium to be made by the individuals covered thereunder, such individual certificate need not be individualized if it is in a form setting forth a clear statement of the conditions of eligibility from which the person covered can determine the circumstances under which he is insured under the master policy.

An individual certificate shall be deemed to be “individualized,” within the meaning of this section, if it contains either the name of the person covered or some other means of identifying to the individual covered that it is his individual certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1729.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.65.

If hereafter any dividend is paid or any premium refunded under any policy of group disability insurance heretofore or hereafter issued, the excess, if any, of the aggregate dividends or premium refunds under such policy over the aggregate expenditures for insurance under such policy made from funds contributed by the policyholder, or by an employer of such insured persons or by union or association to which insured persons belong, including expenditures made in connection with the administration of such policy, shall be applied by the policyholder for the benefit of such insured employees generally or their dependents or insured members generally or their dependents. For the purpose of this section and at the option of the policyholder, “policy” may include all group life and disability insurance policies of the policyholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1746.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.7.

Family expense disability insurance is that form of disability insurance insuring more than one person and issued to the head of a family or his spouse indemnifying him, or his spouse, or both, against loss due to disability of one or more persons dependent at the time of issuance upon him, or his spouse, or both, and may include indemnification on account of his own disability and disability of his spouse whether or not either is dependent on the other.

Where such a policy provides for payment for expenses incurred, expenses incurred by or upon behalf of any person covered by the policy shall be deemed incurred by the person to whom or at whose direction benefits are payable under the policy.

No question as to whether or not any person is the head of the family or his spouse, or is a child or dependent of either shall relieve the insurer of any liability it otherwise would have under the policy.

Where such a policy indemnifies a spouse alone or a spouse and the head of the family, references in the policy to the head of the family shall be deemed to refer to or include the spouse.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 887.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.8.

Family expense disability policies shall also contain the following provisions:

(a) A provision that the policy and the application, if any, of the head of the family shall constitute the entire contract between the parties, and that all statements made by the head of the family shall, in the absence of fraud, be deemed representations and not warranties, and that no statement shall be used in defense to a claim under the policy, unless it is contained in a written application;

(b) A provision that to the family originally insured may be added from time to time all new members of the family eligible for insurance in such family; and that the head of the family shall give the insurer notice of the addition to the family of any person eligible for coverage under the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1596.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.9.

No group disability policy shall be issued or delivered in this state nor, except as otherwise provided in Sections 10270.91 and 10270.98, shall an insurer provide or agree to provide group disability coverage until a copy of the form of the policy is filed with the commissioner and approved by him in accordance with Article 2 of this chapter as meeting in substance the reasonably applicable provisions and requirements of either Articles 3, 4 and 5 of this chapter or Articles 3a, 4a and 5a of this chapter; provided, however, that the insurer may, at its option, substitute for one or more of such provisions of Articles 4a and 5a corresponding provisions of different wording approved by the commissioner which are in each instance not less favorable in any respect to the policyholder, the certificate holder or the beneficiary. On and after January 1, 1957, no group disability policy shall be issued or delivered in this state unless the form thereof has been approved, as required by this section, as meeting in substance the provisions and requirements of Articles 3a, 4a and 5a of this chapter which are reasonably applicable; provided, however, that the insurer may, at its option, substitute for one or more of such provisions of Articles 4a and 5a corresponding provisions of different wording approved by the commissioner which are in each instance not less favorable in any respect to the policyholder, the certificate holder or the beneficiary.

Except as provided by Section 10314, no group disability policy shall be issued or delivered to any person in this state nor shall any endorsement for any such policy be issued which contains any provision contradictory, in whole or in part, of any of the provisions promulgated by the commissioner as being required or optional or alternative provisions to be incorporated into such policy in accordance with the rules promulgated by him for their use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1548.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.91.

An insurer is permitted to provide group disability coverage prior to the approval of the form of the policy if all of the conditions of (a) are met prior thereto and if thereafter it acts as required by (b).

(a) The conditions precedent are:

(1) The group is one eligible for coverage pursuant to the provisions of this article; and

(2) An executed memorandum of insurance has been or is concurrently delivered to the entity which is to become the policyholder containing a provision that unless a policy the form of which has been approved by the commissioner and embodying the coverage has been issued and delivered to the policyholder within 90 days after the date on which the coverage is provided or agreed to be provided, the coverage provided pursuant to such memorandum terminates 120 days after such date, and containing a specification in either complete or summary form of:

(i) The class or classes of employees eligible for coverage;

(ii) The benefits to be provided; and

(iii) The exceptions and reductions to such benefits, if any.

(b) An insurer providing coverage pursuant to this section shall:

(1) Within 60 days after the date on which the coverage is provided or agreed to be provided submit to the commissioner for approval a policy form drafted to provide the coverage provided by such memorandum and in a good faith attempt to meet all requirements of law;

(2) Make such revisions in the policy submitted as the commissioner may lawfully require; and

(3) Terminate such coverage in accordance with the provisions of (a) (2) above if approval of such policy is not secured within the time specified therein.

Upon written request from the insurer filed within 50 days after the date on which the coverage is provided or agreed to be provided and upon proof satisfactory to him that the insurer is acting with due diligence and that hardship will result unless an extension is granted, the commissioner may extend the time set forth in (b) (1) hereof for a period of not to exceed 30 days. Upon such extension, the insurer with the consent of the policyholder may amend the memorandum of insurance referred to in (a) (2) hereof to extend the time within which the policy must be issued and delivered to the policyholder to 30 days after the date to which the commissioner has extended the time within which a policy form must be submitted to him for approval and to extend the date for termination of coverage to 30 days thereafter.

Any policy submitted to the commissioner with a letter from the insurer stating that coverage has been provided in accordance with this section shall be automatically approved unless the commissioner disapproves the same within 30 days of the date of its submission to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.92.

The commissioner may suspend or revoke the permission granted any insurer in Section 10270.91 if, after notice and hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, he finds that the insurer has:

(a) Misrepresented the conditional nature of the coverage;

(b) Neglected or refused either to cancel or otherwise terminate such coverage within the time required by such section;

(c) Delivered any such memorandum which did not comply with subsection (a) (2) of Section 10270.91;

(d) Shown a lack of diligence in making revisions in the policy necessary to obtain its approval by the commissioner;

(e) Failed so often in so many important respects in drafting any such policy to conform to the applicable requirements of the Insurance Code that a conclusion of lack of good faith or competency in drafting is reasonably justified;

(f) Circulated announcements of coverage to individuals insured which failed to advise them of the conditional nature of the coverage; or

(g) In any other manner so negligently or carelessly handled the effecting of insurance under Section 10270.91 or the administration thereof that the policyholder or the persons insured have been misled or exposed to the danger of loss.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.93.

No family expense disability policy shall be issued or delivered in this State unless a copy of the form thereof is filed with the commissioner and approved by him in accordance with Article 2 of this chapter as meeting in substance either the provisions and requirements of Articles 3, 4 and 5 of this chapter which are reasonably applicable, or the provisions and requirements of Articles 3a, 4a and 5a of this chapter which are reasonably applicable; provided, however, that the insurer may, at its option, substitute for one or more of such provisions of Articles 4a and 5a corresponding provisions of different wording approved by the commissioner which are in each instance not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary.

Except as provided by Section 10314, no family expense disability policy shall be issued or delivered to any person in this State nor shall any endorsement for any such policy be issued which contains any provision contradictory, in whole or in part, of any of the provisions promulgated by the commissioner as being required or optional or alternative provisions to be incorporated into such policy, except a policy or endorsement which has been approved by the commissioner under Article 2 of this chapter as meeting the applicable requirements of Articles 2, 3a, 4a and 5a of this chapter and as containing the provisions or substitute provisions as required by Articles 4a and 5a of this chapter modified in such manner as to make the provisions consistent with family expense coverage and the coverage provided in the policy and endorsement, if any. On and after January 1, 1957, no family expense disability policy shall be delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this State unless it complies with Articles 2, 3a, 4a and 5a of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.94.

The commissioner shall promulgate forms of provisions which incorporate in substance the applicable provisions set forth in Articles 4 (commencing with Section 10329), 4a (commencing with Section 10350), 5 (commencing with Section 10359), and 5a (commencing with Section 10369.1), and shall promulgate rules governing the use of those provisions, incorporating the substance, insofar as applicable, of the corresponding rules contained in this chapter for the use of the provisions set forth in Articles 4, 4a, 5, and 5a. However, as of January 1, 1957, the promulgation of provisions and rules governing their use incorporating in substance the applicable provisions of Articles 3 (commencing with Section 10309), 4 (commencing with Section 10329), and 5 (commencing with Section 10359) shall cease to be effective, and on and after January 1, 1957, only the promulgation of provisions and rules governing their use incorporating in substance the applicable provisions of Articles 3a (commencing with Section 10320), 4a (commencing with Section 10350), and 5a (commencing with Section 10369.1) shall be effective. The commissioner may from time to time thereafter change any such provisions or rules governing their use previously promulgated by him or her. The promulgation of any such provisions or rules governing their use and of any changes or amendments thereof shall be in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 96.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.95.

Without affecting the applicability or degree of applicability of other sections of this chapter, it is hereby specified that the provisions of Sections 10321, 10325, 10401, of subdivisions (a), (c), (e), (h) and (i) of Section 10320, of subdivision (a) of Section 10290, of paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (11) and (12) of subdivision (b) and subdivisions (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), and (k) of Section 10291.5 and of Section 10291.6, shall not apply to group disability insurance. The provisions of Section 10401 shall not apply to family expense disability insurance; provided, there is no discrimination between families of the same class.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 94, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.97.

Selected group disability insurance is that form of disability insurance conforming to the following conditions:

(a) Written under individual policies

(1) Issued to not less than three employees of the federal or state government, or of any federal or state agency, political subdivision or district, or of any public, governmental, or municipal corporation, or of any unit, agency, or department thereof, or of any corporation, copartnership or individual employer; or 

(2) Issued to not less than three members of any association, which shall have been in existence for at least two years, having a constitution and bylaws and formed and continuously maintained in good faith for purposes other than that of obtaining insurance; and

(3) For amounts of insurance based upon individual selection by the insured employee or member, as the case may be.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 10401 insurers may be permitted to file (for use in connection with selected group disability insurance), rate schedules that reflect a differential from the rates charged for identical policies issued on the individual basis, provided they do not make or permit any discrimination between selected groups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 443, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.98.

Group disability policies may provide, among other things, that the benefits payable thereunder are subject to reduction if the individual insured has any other coverage (other than individual policies or contracts) providing hospital, surgical or medical benefits, whether on an indemnity basis or a provision of service basis, resulting in such insured being eligible for more than 100 percent of the covered expenses.

Except as permitted by this section and by Section 10323, 10369.5, 10369.6, or 11515.5, and except in the case of group practice prepayment plan contracts which do not provide for coordination of benefits, to the extent they provide for a reduction of benefits on account of other coverage with respect to emergency services that are not obtained from providers that contract with the plan, no group or individual disability insurance policy or service contract issued by nonprofit hospital service plans operating under Chapter 11A (commencing with Section 11491) of Part 2 of Division 2 shall limit payment of benefits by reason of the existence of other insurance or service coverage.

The policy provisions authorized by this section shall contain a provision that payments of funds may be made directly between insurers and other providers of benefits. Such policy provisions shall also contain a provision that if benefits are provided in the form of services rather than cash payments the reasonable cash value of each service rendered shall be deemed to be both an allowable expense and a benefit paid. The reasonable cash value of any contractual benefit provided to the insured in the form of service rather than cash payment by or through any hospital service organization or medical service organization or group-practice prepayment plan shall be deemed an expense incurred by the insured for such service, whether or not actually incurred, and the liability of the insurer shall be the same as if the insured had not been entitled to any such service benefit, unless the policy contains a provision authorized by Section 10323, 10369.5 or 10369.6 in the case of an individual disability policy, or by this section, in the case of a group disability policy.

This section shall not be construed to require that benefits payable under group disability policies be subject to reduction by the benefit amounts payable under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 2800) of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

The provisions of this section, and all regulations adopted pursuant thereto pertaining to coordination of benefits with other group disability benefits, shall apply to all employers, labor-management trustee plans, union welfare plans (including those established in conformity with 29 U.S.C. Sec. 186), employer organization plans or employee benefit organization plans, health care service plan contracts, pursuant to regulations adopted by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care which shall be uniform with those issued under this section for those plans that elect to coordinate benefits, group practice, individual practice, any other prepayment coverage for medical or dental care or treatment, and administrators, within the meaning of Section 1759 not otherwise subject to the provisions of this section whenever such plan, contract or practice provides or administers hospital, surgical, medical or dental benefits to employees or agents who are also covered under one or more additional group disability policies which are subject to this section or health care service plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10270.99.

The term “individual policies or contracts,” as used in the first paragraph of Section 10270.98, does not include selected group disability policies or contracts, unless those policies or contracts are noncancelable or guaranteed renewable and solely provide hospital confinement indemnity or specified disease coverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10271.

(a) Except as set forth in this section and in Sections 10271.1, 10292, and 10295 to 10295.19, inclusive, this chapter does not apply to, or in any way affect, provisions in life insurance, endowment, or annuity contracts, or contracts supplemental thereto, that provide additional benefits in case of death or dismemberment or loss of sight by accident, or that operate to safeguard those contracts against lapse, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 10271.1, or give a special surrender benefit, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 10271.1, a terminal illness benefit, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 10271.1, or an accelerated death benefit, as defined in Article 2.1 (commencing with Section 10295), in the event that the owner, insured,
 or annuitant, as applicable, meets the benefit triggers specified in the life insurance or annuity contract or supplemental contract.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “supplemental benefit” means a rider to or provision in a life insurance policy, certificate, or annuity contract that provides a benefit as set forth in subdivision (a).

(c) A supplemental benefit described in subdivision (a) shall contain all of the following provisions. However, an insurer, at its option, may substitute for one or more of the provisions a corresponding provision of different wording approved by the commissioner that is not less favorable in any respect to the owner, insured, or annuitant, as applicable. The required provisions shall be preceded individually by the appropriate caption, or,
 at the option of the insurer, by the appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions as the commissioner may approve.

(1) A life insurance policy or annuity contract that contains a supplemental benefit shall provide that the contract, supplemental contract, and papers attached thereto by the insurer, including the application if attached, constitute the entire insurance or annuity contract and shall also provide that an agent does not have the authority to change the contract or to waive its provisions. This provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “ENTIRE CONTRACT; CHANGES:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may approve.

(2) The supplemental benefit shall provide that reinstatement of the supplemental benefit shall be on the
 same or more favorable terms as reinstatement of the underlying life insurance policy or annuity contract. Following reinstatement, the insured and insurer shall have the same rights under reinstatement as they had under the supplemental benefit immediately before the due date of the defaulted premium, subject to the provisions endorsed in the rider or endorsement or attached to the rider or endorsement in connection with the reinstatement. This reinstatement provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “REINSTATEMENT:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may approve.

(3) A supplemental benefit subject to underwriting shall include an incontestability statement that provides that the insurer shall not contest the supplemental benefit after it has been in force during the lifetime of the insured for two years
 from its date of issue, and that the supplemental benefit may only be contested based on a statement made in the application for the supplemental benefit, if the statement is attached to the contract and if the statement was material to the risk accepted or the hazard assumed by the insurer. This provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “INCONTESTABILITY:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may approve.

(4) A supplemental benefit shall contain the provision in subparagraph (A), except that an accelerated death benefit as defined in Article 2.1 (commencing with Section 10295) shall contain the provision in subparagraph (B).

(A) The supplemental benefit shall provide either that the insurer may accept written notice of claim at any time or that
 the insurer may require that written notice of claim be submitted by a due date that is no less than 20 days after an occurrence covered by the supplemental benefit, or commencement of a loss covered by the supplemental benefit, or as soon after the due date as is reasonably possible. Notice given by or on behalf of the insured or the beneficiary, as applicable, to the insurer at the insurer’s address or telephone number, or to an authorized agent of the insurer, with information sufficient to identify the insured, shall be deemed notice to the insurer. This provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “NOTICE OF CLAIM:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may approve.

(B) The accelerated death benefit shall provide either that the insured may give notice of claim at any time or that the insured shall
 give notice of claim by a due date that is at least 20 days after the insured receives documentation that establishes the occurrence of a qualifying event, or as soon after the due date as is reasonably possible. Notice given by or on behalf of the insured or the beneficiary, as applicable, to the insurer at the insurer’s address or telephone number, or to an authorized agent of the insurer, with information sufficient to identify the insured, shall be deemed notice to the insurer. This provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “NOTICE OF CLAIM:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may approve.

(5) A supplemental benefit shall contain the provision in subparagraph (A), except that an accelerated death benefit as defined in Article 2.1 (commencing with Section 10295) shall contain the provision in subparagraph
 (B).

(A) The supplemental benefit shall provide that the insurer, upon receipt of a notice of claim, shall furnish to the claimant those forms as are usually furnished by it for filing a proof of occurrence or a proof of loss. If the forms are not furnished within 15 days after giving notice, the claimant shall be deemed to have complied with the requirements of the supplemental benefit as to proof of occurrence or proof of loss upon submitting, within the time fixed by the supplemental benefit for filing proof of occurrence or proof of loss, written proof covering the character and the extent of the occurrence or loss. This provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “CLAIM FORMS:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may approve.

(B) The
 accelerated death benefit shall provide that the insurer, upon receipt of a notice of claim, shall furnish to the claimant any forms required for filing proof of loss. If the forms are not
 furnished within 15 days after notice of claim is given to the insurer, the claimant shall be deemed to have provided proof of loss upon sending, within the time fixed by the supplemental benefit for filing proof of loss, documentation that establishes the occurrence of a qualifying event. This provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “CLAIM FORMS:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may approve.

(6) A supplemental benefit shall contain the provision in subparagraph (A), except that an accelerated death benefit as defined in Article 2.1 (commencing with Section 10295) shall contain the provision in subparagraph (B).

(A) The supplemental benefit shall provide that the insurer may require, in the case of a claim for which the
 supplemental benefit provides a periodic payment contingent upon continuing occurrence or loss, that the insured provide written proof of occurrence or proof of loss no less than 90 days after the termination of the period for which the insurer is liable, and, in the case of claim for any other occurrence or loss, that the insured provide written proof of occurrence or proof of loss within 90 days after the date of the occurrence or loss. Failure to furnish proof within the time required shall not invalidate or reduce the claim if it was not reasonably possible to give proof within the time, provided proof is furnished as soon as reasonably possible and, except in the absence of legal capacity, no later than one year from the time proof is otherwise required. This provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “PROOF OF LOSS:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may
 approve.

(B) The accelerated death benefit shall provide that the insured shall send completed claim forms and documentation that establishes the occurrence of a qualifying event within 90 days of receiving that documentation. Failure to send proof within the time required shall not invalidate or reduce the claim as long as proof is sent as soon as reasonably possible and, except in the absence of legal capacity, no later than one year from the time proof is otherwise required. This provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “PROOF OF LOSS:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may approve.

(7) The supplemental benefit shall provide that the insurer, at its own expense, shall have the right and opportunity to examine the person of the insured when
 and as often as the insurer may reasonably require during the pendency of a claim and to make an autopsy in case of death where it is not forbidden by law. This provision shall be preceded individually by a caption stating “PHYSICAL EXAMINATIONS:” or other appropriate caption as the commissioner may approve.

(d) The commissioner shall not approve a contract or supplemental contract for issuance or delivery in this state if the commissioner finds that the contract or supplemental contract does any of the following:

(1) Contains a provision, label, description of its contents, title, heading, backing, or other indication of its provisions that is unintelligible, uncertain, ambiguous, or abstruse, or likely to mislead a person to whom the supplemental benefit is offered, delivered,
 or issued.

(2) Constitutes fraud, unfair trade practices, or insurance economically unsound to the owner, insured, or annuitant, as applicable.

(3) Contains actuarial information that is materially incomplete, incorrect, or inadequate.

(e) A supplemental benefit described in subdivision (a) shall not contain a title, description, or any other indication that would describe or imply that the supplemental benefit provides long-term care coverage.

(f) Commencing two years from the date of the issuance of the supplemental benefit, no claim for loss incurred or disability, as defined by the supplemental benefit, may be reduced or denied on the grounds that a
 disease or physical condition not excluded from coverage by name or specific description effective on the date of loss had existed before the effective date on the coverage of the supplemental benefit.

(g) With regard to supplemental benefits set forth in subdivision (a), the supplemental benefit shall specify any applicable exclusions, which shall be limited to the following:

(1) Condition or loss caused or substantially contributed to by any attempt at suicide or intentionally self-inflicted injury, while sane or insane.

(2) Condition or loss caused or substantially contributed to by war or an act of war, as defined in the exclusion provisions of the contract.

(3) Condition or loss caused or substantially contributed to by active participation in a riot, insurrection, or terrorist activity.

(4) Condition or loss caused or substantially contributed to by committing or attempting to commit a felony.

(5) Condition or loss caused or substantially contributed to by voluntary intake of either:

(A) A drug, unless prescribed or administered by a physician and taken in accordance with the physician’s instructions.

(B) Poison, gas, or fumes, unless they are the direct result of an occupational accident.

(6) Condition or loss in consequence of the insured
 being intoxicated, as defined by the jurisdiction where the condition or loss occurred.

(7) Condition or loss caused or substantially contributed to by engaging in an illegal occupation.

(8) Condition or loss caused or substantially contributed to by engaging in aviation, other than as a fare-paying passenger.

(h) If the commissioner notifies the insurer, in writing, that the filed form or actuarial information does not comply with the law and specifies the reasons for the commissioner’s opinion, it is unlawful for an insurer to issue a policy in that form.
